test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ceeures_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čeeuʹres e-stem pöly: # Noun "nit/saivar" - full paradigm
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čeeuʹres
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čeurraz
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čeurraz
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čeurrsa
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čeurrsest
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čeurrsin
     čeeuʹres+N+Ess+Indef: čeurrsen
     čeeuʹres+N+Par+Indef: čeurrsed
     čeeuʹres+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čeurraztaa, čeurraztää]
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čeurraz
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čeurrsi
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čeurrsid
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čeurrsid
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čeurrsin
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čeurrsivuiʹm
     čeeuʹres+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čeurrsitaa, čeurrsitää]
